Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0188.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. The conveyance authorized by this act shall provide for all of the following: (a) The property shall be used by the grantee exclusively for residential cottages and allied recreational purposes for the benefit of ex-service personnel, their spouses, and direct lineal descendants, immediate family, including parents, siblings, and descendants of the immediate family, consistent with the purpose prescribed in prior leases executed in this state for the use and occupancy of those lands. (b) Upon termination of the use described in subdivision (a), use for any other purpose, or a violation of the requirement of section 4, the state may reenter and repossess the property, terminating the grantee's estate in the property. (c) If the grantee disputes the state's exercise of its right of reentry and fails to promptly deliver possession of the property to the state, the attorney general, on behalf of the state, may bring an action to quiet title to, and regain possession of, the property. Sec. 4. The conveyance authorized under this act shall require all of the following: (a) The use and eligibility for ownership of residences and grounds within the property shall be limited to ex-service personnel, their spouses, and direct lineal descendants.immediate family, including parents, siblings, and descendants of the immediate family. (b) The camp Curnalia cottage owners association shall enforce the requirement of subdivision (a). (c) The camp Curnalia cottage owners association shall not amend its bylaws or rules in a manner that violates the requirement of subdivision (a), or fail to enforce the requirement of subdivision (a). (d) Any further conveyance by the camp Curnalia cottage owners association of all or any part of the property conveyed under this act, whether by deed, operation of law, or otherwise, shall be made specifically subject to the requirements of subdivision (a).